District of Columbia statutes.
1-402

Applicability of federal laws.

The provisions of law which appear in:

(1)

Section 25 (relating to oath of office),

(2)

Section 31 (relating to compensation),

(3)

Section 34 (relating to payment of compensation),

(4)

Section 35 (relating to payment of compensation),

(5)

Section 37 (relating to payment of compensation),

(6)

Section 38a (relating to compensation),

(7)

Section 39 (relating to deductions for absence),

(8)

Section 40 (relating to deductions for withdrawal),

(9)

Section 40a (relating to deductions for delinquent indebtedness),

(10)

Section 41 [repealed] (relating to prohibition on allowance for newspapers),

(11)

Section 42c [repealed] (relating to postage allowance),

(12)

Section 46b [repealed] (relating to stationery allowance),

(13)

Section 46b-1 (relating to stationery allowance),

(14)

Section 46b-2 [repealed] (relating to stationery allowance),

(15)

Section 46g [repealed] (relating to telephone, telegraph, and radio-telegraph allowance),

(16)

Section 47 (relating to payment of compensation),

(17)

Section 48 (relating to payment of compensation),

(18)

Section 49 (relating to payment of compensation),

(19)

Section 50 (relating to payment of compensation),

(20)

Section 54 (relating to provision of United States Code Annotated or Federal Code Annotated),

(21)

Section 60g-1 [repealed] (relating to clerk hire),

(22)

Section 60g-2(a) (relating to interns),

(23)

Section 80 (relating to payment of compensation),

(24)

Section 81 [repealed] (relating to payment of compensation),

(25)

Section 82 [repealed] (relating to payment of compensation),

(26)

Section 92 (relating to clerk hire),

(27)

Section 92b (relating to pay of clerical assistants),

(28)

Section 112e (relating to electrical and mechanical office equipment),

(29)

Section 122 [repealed] (relating to office space in the District of Columbia), and

(30)

Section 123b (relating to use of House Recording Studio),

of Title 2 of the United States Code shall apply with respect to the Delegate to the House of Representatives from the District of Columbia in the same manner and to the same extent as they apply with respect to a Representative. The Federal Corrupt Practices Act [repealed] and the Federal Contested Election Act shall apply with respect to the Delegate to the House of Representatives from the District of Columbia in the same manner and to the same extent as they apply with respect to a Representative.

Sept. 22, 1970, 84 Stat. 852, Pub. L. 91-405, title II, § 204(a)

History

1981 Ed., § 1-402.
1973 Ed., § 1-292.

Prior Codifications

References in Text

Sections 41, 42c, 46b, 46b-2, and 46g of Title 2 of the United States Code, referred to in (10), (11), (12), (14), and (15), respectively, were repealed by § 203 of the Act of August 20, 1996, Pub. L. 104-186, Title II, 110 Stat. 1726.

Section 60g-1 of Title 2 of the United States Code, referred to in (21), was repealed by § 477(a)(2) of the Act of October 26, 1970, Pub. L. 91-510, effective immediately prior to noon on January 3, 1971.

Section 81 of Title 2 of the United States Code, referred to in (24), was repealed by § 505(2) of the Act of July 12, 1974, Pub. L. 93-344, 88 Stat. 322.

Section 82 of Title 2 of the United States Code, referred to in (25), was repealed by § 220(d) and (e) of the Act of June 6, 1972, Pub. L. 92-310, 86 Stat. 204.

Section 122 of Title 2 of the United States Code, referred to in (29), was repealed by § 111 of the Act of September 30, 1978, Pub. L. 95-391, 92 Stat. 778.

The “Federal Corrupt Practices Act”, referred to in the last paragraph, was repealed by § 405 of the Federal Election Campaign Act of 1971, approved February 7, 1972, Pub. L. 92-225, 86 Stat. 3.

The “Federal Contested Election Act”, referred to in the last paragraph, is the Act of December 5, 1969, Pub. L. 91-138, 83 Stat. 284.